District of Columbia statutes.
42-1206

Public records to be open for free, public inspection.

All public records which have reference to or in any way relate to real or personal property in the District of Columbia, whether the same be in the office of the Recorder of Deeds or in some other public office in the District of Columbia, shall be open to the public for inspection free of charge.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1277, ch. 854, § 556

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-906.
1973 Ed., § 45-705.